Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.020

Licensing required.

It shall hereafter be unlawful for any person to practice pharmacy or to institute or operate any pharmacy unless such person shall be a licensed pharmacist or shall place in charge of said pharmacy a licensed pharmacist: PROVIDED, That persons licensed as manufacturers or as wholesalers, and their employees, acting within the scope of their licenses, shall be exempt from this section.

[ 1979 c 90 s 6; 1899 c 121 s 1; RRS s 10126. Prior: 1891 c 113 s 1. Formerly RCW 18.67.010, part.]